koi/koi.aff
FLAG long
SFX V5 Y 365 # +согласная
SFX V5 0 0 .
SFX V5 0 мӧн .
SFX V5 0 мӧна .
SFX V5 0 мӧнныд .
SFX V5 0 мӧнным .
SFX V5 0 мӧнныс .
SFX V5 0 мӧнсӧ .
SFX V5 0 мӧнсьыс .
SFX V5 0 мӧнъя .
SFX V5 0 мӧныд .
SFX V5 0 мӧныс .
SFX V5 0 мӧнысь .
SFX V5 0 мысьт .
SFX V5 0 ныд .
SFX V5 0 ныджык .
SFX V5 0 ныкодь .
SFX V5 0 ным .
SFX V5 0 ныс .
SFX V5 0 нысӧ .
SFX V5 0 нытӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧг .
SFX V5 0 тӧга .
SFX V5 0 тӧгджыг .
SFX V5 0 тӧгмоз .
SFX V5 0 тӧгныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧгным .
SFX V5 0 тӧгныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧгъя .
SFX V5 0 тӧгыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧгыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧдз .
SFX V5 0 тӧдзныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧдзным .
SFX V5 0 тӧдзныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧдзыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧдзыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧм .
SFX V5 0 тӧма .
SFX V5 0 тӧмад .
SFX V5 0 тӧмакодь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмам .
SFX V5 0 тӧманӧй .
SFX V5 0 тӧманыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧманым .
SFX V5 0 тӧманыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмас .
SFX V5 0 тӧмджык .
SFX V5 0 тӧмкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдз .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдзыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьӧдыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьыныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьыным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьыныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсяньныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсяньным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсяньныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсяньыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьсяньыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьтіыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьын .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланьысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланяд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланям .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланяныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланяным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланяныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмланяс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнад .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнам .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнаныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнаным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнаныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнас .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныдлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнымӧс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныскӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнысла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныслань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныслӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныслы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмныслысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнысӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмнытӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдз .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдзыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧдыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧй .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйланьсянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйся .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйсянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧйтӧг .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмӧсь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьыныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьыным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьыныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмся .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяньыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмсяыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмті .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтіыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧг .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧгныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧгным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧгныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧгыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмтӧгыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясад .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясам .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясанӧй .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясаныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясаным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясаныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясас .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяскӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяслань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдзыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьӧдыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьыныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьыным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьыныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсяньныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсяньным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсяньныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсяньыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьсяньыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьтіыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланяд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланям .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланяныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланяным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланяныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясланяс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяслӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяслы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяслысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснад .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснам .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснаныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснаным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснаныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснас .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныдлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснымӧс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныскӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснысла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныслань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныслӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныслы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясныслысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснысӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяснытӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдз .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдзыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧдыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧй .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйлань .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйланьсянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйся .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйсянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧйтӧг .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясӧс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьыныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьыным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьыныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссьыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясся .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссянь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяньыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъяссяыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясті .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіым .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястіыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧ .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧг .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧгныд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧгным .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧгныс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧгыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъястӧгыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыдкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыдла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыдлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыдлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыдлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясын .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыскӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясысла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыслӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыслы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясыслысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмъясысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыдкӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыдла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыдлӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыдлы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыдлысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмын .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыс .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыскӧд .
SFX V5 0 тӧмысла .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыслӧн .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыслы .
SFX V5 0 тӧмыслысь .
SFX V5 0 тӧмысь .
